Illinois, session 104th, HB4515.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 5by changing the heading of Article 25 and by changing Sections 61-10, 7-10, 7-15, 10-15, 25-1, 25-10, 25-15, 25-35, and 50-5 7as follows: 8    (410 ILCS 705/1-10)9    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. In this Act:10    "Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a license 11issued by the Department of Agriculture that permits a person 12to act as a cultivation center under this Act and any 13administrative rule made in furtherance of this Act.14    "Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" means a 15license issued by the Department of Financial and Professional 16Regulation that permits a person to act as a dispensing 17organization under this Act and any administrative rule made 18in furtherance of this Act.19    "Advertise" means to engage in promotional activities 20including, but not limited to: newspaper, radio, Internet and 21electronic media, and television advertising; the distribution 22of fliers and circulars; billboard advertising; and the 23display of window and interior signs. "Advertise" does not   HB4515- 2 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1mean exterior signage displaying only the name of the licensed 2cannabis business establishment. 3    "Application points" means the number of points a 4Dispensary Applicant receives on an application for a 5Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 6    "BLS Region" means a region in Illinois used by the United 7States Bureau of Labor Statistics to gather and categorize 8certain employment and wage data. The 17 such regions in 9Illinois are: Bloomington, Cape Girardeau, Carbondale-Marion, 10Champaign-Urbana, Chicago-Naperville-Elgin, Danville, 11Davenport-Moline-Rock Island, Decatur, Kankakee, Peoria, 12Rockford, St. Louis, Springfield, Northwest Illinois 13nonmetropolitan area, West Central Illinois nonmetropolitan 14area, East Central Illinois nonmetropolitan area, and South 15Illinois nonmetropolitan area. 16    "By lot" means a randomized method of choosing between 2 17or more Eligible Tied Applicants or 2 or more Qualifying 18Applicants.19    "Cannabis" means marijuana, hashish, and other substances 20that are identified as including any parts of the plant 21Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, such 22as indica, of all strains of cannabis, whether growing or not; 23the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the 24plant; and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, 25mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin, 26including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) and all other naturally   HB4515- 3 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1produced cannabinol derivatives, whether produced directly or 2indirectly by extraction; however, "cannabis" does not include 3the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the 4stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other 5compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or 6preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted 7from it), fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized seed of the 8plant that is incapable of germination. "Cannabis" does not 9include industrial hemp as defined and authorized under the 10Industrial Hemp Act. "Cannabis" also means cannabis flower, 11concentrate, and cannabis-infused products.12    "Cannabis business establishment" means a cultivation 13center, craft grower, processing organization, infuser 14organization, dispensing organization, or transporting 15organization.16    "Cannabis concentrate" means a product derived from 17cannabis that is produced by extracting cannabinoids, 18including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), from the plant through 19the use of propylene glycol, glycerin, butter, olive oil, or 20other typical cooking fats; water, ice, or dry ice; or butane, 21propane, CO2, ethanol, or isopropanol and with the intended 22use of smoking or making a cannabis-infused product. The use 23of any other solvent is expressly prohibited unless and until 24it is approved by the Department of Agriculture.25    "Cannabis container" means a sealed or resealable, 26traceable, container, or package used for the purpose of   HB4515- 4 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1containment of cannabis or cannabis-infused product during 2transportation.3    "Cannabis flower" means marijuana, hashish, and other 4substances that are identified as including any parts of the 5plant Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, 6such as indica, of all strains of cannabis; including raw 7kief, leaves, and buds, but not resin that has been extracted 8from any part of such plant; nor any compound, manufacture, 9salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its 10seeds, or resin.11    "Cannabis-infused product" means a beverage, food, oil, 12ointment, tincture, topical formulation, or another product 13containing cannabis or cannabis concentrate that is not 14intended to be smoked.15    "Cannabis paraphernalia" means equipment, products, or 16materials intended to be used for planting, propagating, 17cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, producing, 18processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, 19repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, ingesting, or 20otherwise introducing cannabis into the human body. 21    "Cannabis plant monitoring system" or "plant monitoring 22system" means a system that includes, but is not limited to, 23testing and data collection established and maintained by the 24cultivation center, craft grower, or processing organization 25and that is available to the Department of Revenue, the 26Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and   HB4515- 5 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1Professional Regulation, and the Illinois State Police for the 2purposes of documenting each cannabis plant and monitoring 3plant development throughout the life cycle of a cannabis 4plant cultivated for the intended use by a customer from seed 5planting to final packaging.6    "Cannabis testing facility" means an entity registered by 7the Department of Agriculture to test cannabis for potency and 8contaminants.9    "Clone" means a plant section from a female cannabis plant 10not yet rootbound, growing in a water solution or other 11propagation matrix, that is capable of developing into a new 12plant.13    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 14Program faculty participant" means a person who is 21 years of 15age or older, licensed by the Department of Agriculture, and 16is employed or contracted by an Illinois community college to 17provide student instruction using cannabis plants at an 18Illinois Community College.19    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 20Program faculty participant Agent Identification Card" means a 21document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 22identifies a person as a Community College Cannabis Vocational 23Training Pilot Program faculty participant.24    "Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 25means a contingent license awarded to applicants for an Adult 26Use Dispensing Organization License that reserves the right to   HB4515- 6 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1an Adult Use Dispensing Organization License if the applicant 2meets certain conditions described in this Act, but does not 3entitle the recipient to begin purchasing or selling cannabis 4or cannabis-infused products.5    "Conditional Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a 6license awarded to top-scoring applicants for an Adult Use 7Cultivation Center License that reserves the right to an Adult 8Use Cultivation Center License if the applicant meets certain 9conditions as determined by the Department of Agriculture by 10rule, but does not entitle the recipient to begin growing, 11processing, or selling cannabis or cannabis-infused products.12    "Craft grower" means a facility operated by an 13organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 14Agriculture to cultivate, dry, cure, and package cannabis and 15perform other necessary activities to make cannabis available 16for sale at a dispensing organization or use at a processing 17organization. A craft grower may contain up to 5,000 square 18feet of canopy space on its premises for plants in the 19flowering state. The Department of Agriculture may authorize 20an increase or decrease of flowering stage cultivation space 21in increments of 3,000 square feet by rule based on market 22need, craft grower capacity, and the licensee's history of 23compliance or noncompliance, with a maximum space of 14,000 24square feet for cultivating plants in the flowering stage, 25which must be cultivated in all stages of growth in an enclosed 26and secure area. A craft grower may share premises with a   HB4515- 7 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1processing organization or a dispensing organization, or both, 2provided each licensee stores currency and cannabis or 3cannabis-infused products in a separate secured vault to which 4the other licensee does not have access or all licensees 5sharing a vault share more than 50% of the same ownership. 6    "Craft grower agent" means a principal officer, board 7member, employee, or other agent of a craft grower who is 21 8years of age or older.9    "Craft Grower Agent Identification Card" means a document 10issued by the Department of Agriculture that identifies a 11person as a craft grower agent.12    "Cultivation center" means a facility operated by an 13organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 14Agriculture to cultivate, process, transport (unless otherwise 15limited by this Act), and perform other necessary activities 16to provide cannabis and cannabis-infused products to cannabis 17business establishments.18    "Cultivation center agent" means a principal officer, 19board member, employee, or other agent of a cultivation center 20who is 21 years of age or older.21    "Cultivation Center Agent Identification Card" means a 22document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 23identifies a person as a cultivation center agent.24    "Currency" means currency and coin of the United States.25    "Dispensary" means a facility operated by a dispensing 26organization at which activities licensed by this Act may   HB4515- 8 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1occur.2    "Dispensary Applicant" means the Proposed Dispensing 3Organization Name as stated on an application for a 4Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 5    "Dispensing organization" means a facility operated by an 6organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 7Financial and Professional Regulation to acquire cannabis from 8a cultivation center, craft grower, processing organization, 9or another dispensary for the purpose of selling or dispensing 10cannabis, cannabis-infused products, cannabis seeds, 11paraphernalia, or related supplies under this Act to 12purchasers or to qualified registered medical cannabis 13patients and caregivers. As used in this Act, "dispensing 14organization" includes a registered medical cannabis 15organization as defined in the Compassionate Use of Medical 16Cannabis Program Act or its successor Act that has obtained an 17Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License.18    "Dispensing organization agent" means a principal officer, 19employee, or agent of a dispensing organization who is 21 20years of age or older.21    "Dispensing organization agent identification card" means 22a document issued by the Department of Financial and 23Professional Regulation that identifies a person as a 24dispensing organization agent.25    "Disproportionately Impacted Area" means a census tract or 26comparable geographic area that satisfies the following   HB4515- 9 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1criteria as determined by the Department of Commerce and 2Economic Opportunity, that: 3        (1) meets at least one of the following criteria: 4            (A) the area has a poverty rate of at least 20% 5        according to the latest federal decennial census; or 6            (B) 75% or more of the children in the area 7        participate in the federal free lunch program 8        according to reported statistics from the State Board 9        of Education; or 10            (C) at least 20% of the households in the area 11        receive assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition 12        Assistance Program; or13            (D) the area has an average unemployment rate, as 14        determined by the Illinois Department of Employment 15        Security, that is more than 120% of the national 16        unemployment average, as determined by the United 17        States Department of Labor, for a period of at least 2 18        consecutive calendar years preceding the date of the 19        application; and 20        (2) has high rates of arrest, conviction, and 21    incarceration related to the sale, possession, use, 22    cultivation, manufacture, or transport of cannabis.23    "Early Approval Adult Use Cultivation Center License" 24means a license that permits a medical cannabis cultivation 25center licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 26Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to   HB4515- 10 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1begin cultivating, infusing, packaging, transporting (unless 2otherwise provided in this Act), processing, and selling 3cannabis or cannabis-infused product to cannabis business 4establishments for resale to purchasers as permitted by this 5Act as of January 1, 2020.6    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 7means a license that permits a medical cannabis dispensing 8organization licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 9Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to 10begin selling cannabis or cannabis-infused product to 11purchasers as permitted by this Act as of January 1, 2020.12    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization at a 13secondary site" means a license that permits a medical 14cannabis dispensing organization licensed under the 15Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act as of the 16effective date of this Act to begin selling cannabis or 17cannabis-infused product to purchasers as permitted by this 18Act on January 1, 2020 at a different dispensary location from 19its existing registered medical dispensary location.20    "Eligible Tied Applicant" means a Tied Applicant that is 21eligible to participate in the process by which a remaining 22available license is distributed by lot pursuant to a Tied 23Applicant Lottery. 24    "Enclosed, locked facility" means a room, greenhouse, 25building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 26security devices that permit access only by cannabis business   HB4515- 11 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1establishment agents working for the licensed cannabis 2business establishment or acting pursuant to this Act to 3cultivate, process, store, or distribute cannabis.4    "Enclosed, locked space" means a closet, room, greenhouse, 5building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 6security devices that permit access only by authorized 7individuals under this Act. "Enclosed, locked space" may 8include:9        (1) a space within a residential building that (i) is 10    the primary residence of the individual cultivating 5 or 11    fewer cannabis plants that are more than 5 inches tall and 12    (ii) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing. The 13    space must only be accessible by a key or code that is 14    different from any key or code that can be used to access 15    the residential building from the exterior; or16        (2) a structure, such as a shed or greenhouse, that 17    lies on the same plot of land as a residential building 18    that (i) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing 19    and (ii) is used as a primary residence by the person 20    cultivating 5 or fewer cannabis plants that are more than 21    5 inches tall, such as a shed or greenhouse. The structure 22    must remain locked when it is unoccupied by people. 23    "Financial institution" has the same meaning as "financial 24organization" as defined in Section 1501 of the Illinois 25Income Tax Act, and also includes the holding companies, 26subsidiaries, and affiliates of such financial organizations.   HB4515- 12 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    "Flowering stage" means the stage of cultivation where and 2when a cannabis plant is cultivated to produce plant material 3for cannabis products. This includes mature plants as follows:4        (1) if greater than 2 stigmas are visible at each 5    internode of the plant; or6        (2) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has been 7    intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 8    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, 9    from the moment the light deprivation began through the 10    remainder of the marijuana plant growth cycle.11    "Individual" means a natural person.12    "Infuser organization" or "infuser" means a facility 13operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 14the Department of Agriculture to directly incorporate cannabis 15or cannabis concentrate into a product formulation to produce 16a cannabis-infused product. 17    "Kief" means the resinous crystal-like trichomes that are 18found on cannabis and that are accumulated, resulting in a 19higher concentration of cannabinoids, untreated by heat or 20pressure, or extracted using a solvent. 21    "Labor peace agreement" means an agreement between a 22cannabis business establishment and any labor organization 23recognized under the National Labor Relations Act, referred to 24in this Act as a bona fide labor organization, that prohibits 25labor organizations and members from engaging in picketing, 26work stoppages, boycotts, and any other economic interference   HB4515- 13 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1with the cannabis business establishment. This agreement means 2that the cannabis business establishment has agreed not to 3disrupt efforts by the bona fide labor organization to 4communicate with, and attempt to organize and represent, the 5cannabis business establishment's employees. The agreement 6shall provide a bona fide labor organization access at 7reasonable times to areas in which the cannabis business 8establishment's employees work, for the purpose of meeting 9with employees to discuss their right to representation, 10employment rights under State law, and terms and conditions of 11employment. This type of agreement shall not mandate a 12particular method of election or certification of the bona 13fide labor organization.14    "Limited access area" means a room or other area under the 15control of a cannabis dispensing organization licensed under 16this Act and upon the licensed premises where cannabis sales 17occur with access limited to purchasers, dispensing 18organization owners and other dispensing organization agents, 19or service professionals conducting business with the 20dispensing organization, or, if sales to registered qualifying 21patients, caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid 22Alternative Pilot Program participants licensed pursuant to 23the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act are also 24permitted at the dispensary, registered qualifying patients, 25caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid Alternative Pilot 26Program participants.   HB4515- 14 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    "Member of an impacted family" means an individual who has 2a parent, legal guardian, child, spouse, or dependent, or was 3a dependent of an individual who, prior to the effective date 4of this Act, was arrested for, convicted of, or adjudicated 5delinquent for any offense that is eligible for expungement 6under this Act.7    "Mother plant" means a cannabis plant that is cultivated 8or maintained for the purpose of generating clones, and that 9will not be used to produce plant material for sale to an 10infuser or dispensing organization.11    "Ordinary public view" means within the sight line with 12normal visual range of a person, unassisted by visual aids, 13from a public street or sidewalk adjacent to real property, or 14from within an adjacent property. 15    "Ownership and control" means ownership of at least 51% of 16the business, including corporate stock if a corporation, and 17control over the management and day-to-day operations of the 18business and an interest in the capital, assets, and profits 19and losses of the business proportionate to percentage of 20ownership.21    "Person" means a natural individual, firm, partnership, 22association, joint stock company, joint venture, public or 23private corporation, limited liability company, or a receiver, 24executor, trustee, guardian, or other representative appointed 25by order of any court.26    "Possession limit" means the amount of cannabis under   HB4515- 15 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1Section 10-10 that may be possessed at any one time by a person 221 years of age or older or who is a registered qualifying 3medical cannabis patient or caregiver under the Compassionate 4Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act.5    "Principal officer" includes a cannabis business 6establishment applicant or licensed cannabis business 7establishment's board member, owner with more than 1% interest 8of the total cannabis business establishment or more than 5% 9interest of the total cannabis business establishment of a 10publicly traded company, president, vice president, secretary, 11treasurer, partner, officer, member, manager member, or person 12with a profit sharing, financial interest, or revenue sharing 13arrangement. The definition includes a person with authority 14to control the cannabis business establishment, a person who 15assumes responsibility for the debts of the cannabis business 16establishment and who is further defined in this Act.17    "Primary residence" means a dwelling where a person 18usually stays or stays more often than other locations. It may 19be determined by, without limitation, presence, tax filings; 20address on an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 21Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a Disability 22Identification Card; or voter registration. No person may have 23more than one primary residence.24    "Processing organization" or "processor" means a facility 25operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 26the Department of Agriculture to either extract constituent   HB4515- 16 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1chemicals or compounds to produce cannabis concentrate or 2incorporate cannabis or cannabis concentrate into a product 3formulation to produce a cannabis product. 4    "Processing organization agent" means a principal officer, 5board member, employee, or agent of a processing organization.6    "Processing organization agent identification card" means 7a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 8identifies a person as a processing organization agent.9    "Purchaser" means a person 21 years of age or older who 10acquires cannabis for a valuable consideration. "Purchaser" 11does not include a cardholder under the Compassionate Use of 12Medical Cannabis Program Act.13    "Qualifying Applicant" means an applicant that submitted 14an application pursuant to Section 15-30 that received at 15least 85% of 250 application points available under Section 1615-30 as the applicant's final score and meets the definition 17of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under this Section.18    "Qualifying Social Equity Justice Involved Applicant" 19means an applicant that submitted an application pursuant to 20Section 15-30 that received at least 85% of 250 application 21points available under Section 15-30 as the applicant's final 22score and meets the criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2) of 23the definition of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under 24this Section. 25    "Qualified Social Equity Applicant" means a Social Equity 26Applicant who has been awarded a conditional license under   HB4515- 17 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1this Act to operate a cannabis business establishment.2    "Resided" means an individual's primary residence was 3located within the relevant geographic area as established by 42 of the following:5        (1) a signed lease agreement that includes the 6    applicant's name;7        (2) a property deed that includes the applicant's 8    name;9        (3) school records;10        (4) a voter registration card;11        (5) an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 12    Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a 13    Disability Identification Card;14        (6) a paycheck stub; 15        (7) a utility bill; 16        (8) tax records; or17        (9) any other proof of residency or other information 18    necessary to establish residence as provided by rule.19    "Smoking" means the inhalation of smoke caused by the 20combustion of cannabis.21    "Social Equity Applicant" means an applicant that is an 22Illinois resident that meets one of the following criteria:23        (1) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 24    control by one or more individuals who have resided for at 25    least 5 of the preceding 10 years in a Disproportionately 26    Impacted Area;   HB4515- 18 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1        (2) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 2    control by one or more individuals who: 3            (i) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 4        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 5        eligible for expungement under this Act; or 6            (ii) is a member of an impacted family;7        (3) for applicants with a minimum of 10 full-time 8    employees, an applicant with at least 51% of current 9    employees who:10            (i) currently reside in a Disproportionately 11        Impacted Area; or12            (ii) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 13        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 14        eligible for expungement under this Act or member of 15        an impacted family.16    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to preempt or limit 17the duties of any employer under the Job Opportunities for 18Qualified Applicants Act. Nothing in this Act shall permit an 19employer to require an employee to disclose sealed or expunged 20offenses, unless otherwise required by law.21    "Tied Applicant" means an application submitted by a 22Dispensary Applicant pursuant to Section 15-30 that received 23the same number of application points under Section 15-30 as 24the Dispensary Applicant's final score as one or more 25top-scoring applications in the same BLS Region and would have 26been awarded a license but for the one or more other   HB4515- 19 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1top-scoring applications that received the same number of 2application points. Each application for which a Dispensary 3Applicant was required to pay a required application fee for 4the application period ending January 2, 2020 shall be 5considered an application of a separate Tied Applicant.6    "Tied Applicant Lottery" means the process established 7under 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1291.50 for awarding Conditional Adult 8Use Dispensing Organization Licenses pursuant to Sections 915-25 and 15-30 among Eligible Tied Applicants. 10    "Tincture" means a cannabis-infused solution, typically 11comprised of alcohol, glycerin, or vegetable oils, derived 12either directly from the cannabis plant or from a processed 13cannabis extract. A tincture is not an alcoholic liquor as 14defined in the Liquor Control Act of 1934. A tincture shall 15include a calibrated dropper or other similar device capable 16of accurately measuring servings.17    "Transporting organization" or "transporter" means an 18organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 19Agriculture to transport cannabis or cannabis-infused product 20on behalf of a cannabis business establishment or a community 21college licensed under the Community College Cannabis 22Vocational Training Pilot Program. 23    "Transporting organization agent" means a principal 24officer, board member, employee, or agent of a transporting 25organization.26    "Transporting organization agent identification card"   HB4515- 20 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1means a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 2identifies a person as a transporting organization agent.3    "Unit of local government" means any county, city, 4village, or incorporated town.5    "Vegetative stage" means the stage of cultivation in which 6a cannabis plant is propagated to produce additional cannabis 7plants or reach a sufficient size for production. This 8includes seedlings, clones, mothers, and other immature 9cannabis plants as follows: 10        (1) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has not 11    been intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 12    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, it 13    has no more than 2 stigmas visible at each internode of the 14    cannabis plant; or 15        (2) any cannabis plant that is cultivated solely for 16    the purpose of propagating clones and is never used to 17    produce cannabis.18(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 19102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 205-13-22.) 21    (410 ILCS 705/7-10)22    Sec. 7-10. Cannabis Business Development Fund. 23    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund, 24which shall be held separate and apart from all other State 25moneys, to be known as the Cannabis Business Development Fund.   HB4515- 21 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1The Cannabis Business Development Fund shall be exclusively 2used for the following purposes:3        (1) to provide low-interest rate loans to Qualified 4    Social Equity Applicants to pay for ordinary and necessary 5    expenses to start and operate a cannabis business 6    establishment permitted by this Act;7        (2) to provide grants to Qualified Social Equity 8    Applicants to pay for ordinary and necessary expenses to 9    start and operate a cannabis business establishment 10    permitted by this Act;11        (3) to compensate the Department of Commerce and 12    Economic Opportunity for any costs related to the 13    provision of low-interest loans and grants to Qualified 14    Social Equity Applicants and grants to community colleges 15    licensed under the Community College Vocational Training 16    Program in Article 25 of this Act; 17        (4) to pay for outreach that may be provided or 18    targeted to attract and support Social Equity Applicants 19    and Qualified Social Equity Applicants;20        (5) (blank); 21        (6) to conduct any study or research concerning the 22    participation of minorities, women, veterans, or people 23    with disabilities in the cannabis industry, including, 24    without limitation, barriers to such individuals entering 25    the industry as equity owners of cannabis business 26    establishments;  HB4515- 22 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1        (7) (blank); and2        (8) to assist with job training and technical 3    assistance for residents in Disproportionately Impacted 4    Areas; and .5        (9) to provide grants to community colleges licensed 6    under the Community College Vocational Training Program in 7    Article 25 of this Act.8    (b) All moneys collected under Sections 15-15 and 15-20 9for Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization Licenses 10issued before January 1, 2021 and remunerations made as a 11result of transfers of permits awarded to Qualified Social 12Equity Applicants shall be deposited into the Cannabis 13Business Development Fund.14    (c) (Blank).15    (c-5) In addition to any other transfers that may be 16provided for by law, on July 1, 2023, or as soon thereafter as 17practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 18Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $40,000,000 from the 19Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Fund to the Cannabis 20Business Development Fund. 21    (d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 22Cannabis Business Development Fund is not subject to sweeps, 23administrative charge-backs, or any other fiscal or budgetary 24maneuver that would in any way transfer any amounts from the 25Cannabis Business Development Fund into any other fund of the 26State.  HB4515- 23 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 2    (410 ILCS 705/7-15)3    Sec. 7-15. Loans and grants to Social Equity Applicants. 4    (a) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 5shall establish grant and loan programs, subject to 6appropriations from the Cannabis Business Development Fund, 7for the purposes of providing financial assistance, loans, 8grants, and technical assistance to Social Equity Applicants 9and grants to community colleges licensed under the Community 10College Vocational Training Program in Article 25 of this Act.11    (b) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 12has the power to: 13        (1) provide Cannabis Social Equity loans and grants 14    from appropriations from the Cannabis Business Development 15    Fund to assist Qualified Social Equity Applicants in 16    gaining entry to, and successfully operating in, the 17    State's regulated cannabis marketplace; 18        (1-b) provide grants from appropriations from the 19    Cannabis Business Development Fund to community colleges 20    licensed under the Community College Vocational Training 21    Program in Article 25 of this Act to further the purposes 22    of this Act;23        (2) enter into agreements that set forth terms and 24    conditions of the financial assistance, accept funds or 25    grants, and engage in cooperation with private entities   HB4515- 24 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    and agencies of State or local government to carry out the 2    purposes of this Section; 3        (3) fix, determine, charge, and collect any premiums, 4    fees, charges, costs and expenses, including application 5    fees, commitment fees, program fees, financing charges, or 6    publication fees in connection with its activities under 7    this Section; 8        (4) coordinate assistance under these loan programs 9    with activities of the Illinois Department of Financial 10    and Professional Regulation, the Illinois Department of 11    Agriculture, and other agencies as needed to maximize the 12    effectiveness and efficiency of this Act; 13        (5) provide staff, administration, and related support 14    required to administer this Section; 15        (6) take whatever actions are necessary or appropriate 16    to protect the State's interest in the event of 17    bankruptcy, default, foreclosure, or noncompliance with 18    the terms and conditions of financial assistance provided 19    under this Section, including the ability to recapture 20    funds if the recipient is found to be noncompliant with 21    the terms and conditions of the financial assistance 22    agreement; 23        (7) establish application, notification, contract, and 24    other forms, procedures, or rules deemed necessary and 25    appropriate; and26        (8) utilize vendors or contract work to carry out the   HB4515- 25 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    purposes of this Act.2    (c) Loans made under this Section: 3        (1) shall only be made if, in the Department's 4    judgment, the project furthers the goals set forth in this 5    Act; and 6        (2) shall be in such principal amount and form and 7    contain such terms and provisions with respect to 8    security, insurance, reporting, delinquency charges, 9    default remedies, and other matters as the Department 10    shall determine appropriate to protect the public interest 11    and to be consistent with the purposes of this Section. 12    The terms and provisions may be less than required for 13    similar loans not covered by this Section.14    (d) Grants made under this Section shall be awarded on a 15competitive and annual basis under the Grant Accountability 16and Transparency Act. Grants made under this Section shall 17further and promote the goals of this Act, including, but not 18limited to, promotion of Social Equity Applicants, job 19training and workforce development, and technical assistance 20to Social Equity Applicants. 21    (e) Beginning January 1, 2021 and each year thereafter, 22the Department shall annually report to the Governor and the 23General Assembly on the outcomes and effectiveness of this 24Section that shall include the following: 25        (1) the number of persons, or businesses, or other 26    entities receiving financial assistance under this   HB4515- 26 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    Section; 2        (2) the amount in financial assistance awarded in the 3    aggregate, in addition to the amount of loans made that 4    are outstanding and the amount of grants awarded; 5        (3) the location of the project engaged in by the 6    person, or business, or entity; and7        (4) if applicable, the number of new jobs and other 8    forms of economic output created as a result of the 9    financial assistance. 10    (f) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 11shall include engagement with individuals with limited English 12proficiency as part of its outreach provided or targeted to 13attract and support Social Equity Applicants.14    (g) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 15shall adopt rules implementing the changes made to this 16Section by this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.17(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 18    (410 ILCS 705/10-15)19    Sec. 10-15. Persons under 21 years of age. 20    (a) Nothing in this Act is intended to permit the transfer 21of cannabis, with or without remuneration, to a person under 2221 years of age, or to allow a person under 21 years of age to 23purchase, possess, use, process, transport, grow, or consume 24cannabis except where authorized by the Compassionate Use of 25Medical Cannabis Program Act or by the Community College   HB4515- 27 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot Program. 2    (b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law 3authorizing the possession of medical cannabis, nothing in 4this Act authorizes a person who is under 21 years of age to 5possess cannabis. A person under 21 years of age with cannabis 6in his or her possession is guilty of a civil law violation as 7outlined in paragraph (a) of Section 4 of the Cannabis Control 8Act.9    (c) If the person under the age of 21 was in a motor 10vehicle at the time of the offense, the Secretary of State may 11suspend or revoke the driving privileges of any person for a 12violation of this Section under Section 6-206 of the Illinois 13Vehicle Code and the rules adopted under it.14    (d) It is unlawful for any parent or guardian to knowingly 15permit his or her residence, any other private property under 16his or her control, or any vehicle, conveyance, or watercraft 17under his or her control to be used by an invitee of the 18parent's child or the guardian's ward, if the invitee is under 19the age of 21, in a manner that constitutes a violation of this 20Section. A parent or guardian is deemed to have knowingly 21permitted his or her residence, any other private property 22under his or her control, or any vehicle, conveyance, or 23watercraft under his or her control to be used in violation of 24this Section if he or she knowingly authorizes or permits 25consumption of cannabis by underage invitees. Any person who 26violates this subsection (d) is guilty of a Class A   HB4515- 28 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1misdemeanor and the person's sentence shall include, but shall 2not be limited to, a fine of not less than $500. If a violation 3of this subsection (d) directly or indirectly results in great 4bodily harm or death to any person, the person violating this 5subsection is guilty of a Class 4 felony. In this subsection 6(d), where the residence or other property has an owner and a 7tenant or lessee, the trier of fact may infer that the 8residence or other property is occupied only by the tenant or 9lessee.10(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 11    (410 ILCS 705/Art. 25 heading)12Article 25.13Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot Program14(Article scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2026)15(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19.) 16    (410 ILCS 705/25-1)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2026)18    Sec. 25-1. Definitions. In this Article:19    "Board" means the Illinois Community College Board.20    "Career in Cannabis Certificate" or "Certificate" means 21the certification awarded to a community college student who 22completes a prescribed course of study in cannabis and 23cannabis business industry related classes and curriculum at a 24community college awarded a Community College Cannabis   HB4515- 29 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1Vocational Training Pilot Program license.2    "Community college" means a public community college 3organized under the Public Community College Act. 4    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture.5    "Licensee" means a community college awarded a Community 6College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot Program license 7under this Article.8    "Program" means the Community College Cannabis Vocational 9Training Pilot Program.10    "Program license" means a Community College Cannabis 11Vocational Training Pilot Program license issued to a 12community college under this Article.13(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 14    (410 ILCS 705/25-10)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2026)16    Sec. 25-10. Issuance of Community College Cannabis 17Vocational Training Pilot Program licenses. 18    (a) The Department shall issue rules regulating the 19selection criteria for applicants by January 1, 2020. The 20Department shall make the application for a Program license 21available no later than February 1, 2020, and shall require 22that applicants submit the completed application no later than 23July 1, 2020. If the Department issues fewer than 8 Program 24licenses by September 1, 2020, the Department may accept 25applications at a future date as prescribed by rule.  HB4515- 30 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    (b) The Department shall by rule develop a system to score 2Program licenses to administratively rank applications based 3on the clarity, organization, and quality of the applicant's 4responses to required information. Applicants shall be awarded 5points that are based on or that meet the following 6categories:7        (1) Geographic diversity of the applicants;8        (2) Experience and credentials of the applicant's 9    faculty;10        (3) At least 5 Program license awardees must have a 11    student population that is more than 50% low-income in 12    each of the past 4 years;13        (4) Security plan, including a requirement that all 14    cannabis plants be in an enclosed, locked facility;15        (5) Curriculum plan, including processing and testing 16    curriculum for the Career in Cannabis Certificate;17        (6) Career advising and placement plan for 18    participating students; and19        (7) Any other criteria the Department may set by rule.20    (c) The community colleges that received a license under 21this Article before the effective date of this amendatory Act 22of the 104th General Assembly shall be deemed to be licensed 23Responsible Vendor Program Training Providers under Section 2415-40 of this Act and rules adopted under this Act. That 25designation may be revoked for cause under rules adopted by 26the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation.   HB4515- 31 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 2    (410 ILCS 705/25-15)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2026)4    Sec. 25-15. Community College Cannabis Vocational Training 5Pilot Program requirements and prohibitions. 6    (a) Licensees shall not have more than 50 flowering 7cannabis plants at any one time. 8    (b) The agent-in-charge shall keep a vault log of the 9licensee's enclosed, locked facility or facilities, including 10but not limited to, the person entering the site location, the 11time of entrance, the time of exit, and any other information 12the Department may set by rule.13    (c) Cannabis shall not be removed from the licensee's 14facility, except for the limited purpose of shipping a sample 15to a laboratory registered under this Act.16    (d) The licensee shall limit keys, access cards, or an 17access code to the licensee's enclosed, locked facility, or 18facilities, to cannabis curriculum faculty and college 19security personnel with a bona fide need to access the 20facility for emergency purposes.21    (e) A transporting organization may transport cannabis 22produced pursuant to this Article to a laboratory registered 23under this Act. All other cannabis produced by the licensee 24that was not shipped to a registered laboratory shall be 25destroyed within 5 weeks of being harvested.  HB4515- 32 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    (f) Licensees shall subscribe to the Department of 2Agriculture's cannabis plant monitoring system.3    (g) Licensees shall maintain a weekly inventory system.4    (h) No student participating in the cannabis curriculum 5necessary to obtain a Certificate may be in the licensee's 6facility unless a faculty agent-in-charge is also physically 7present in the facility. 8    (i) Licensees shall conduct post-certificate follow up 9surveys and record participating students' job placements 10within the cannabis business industry within a year of the 11student's completion.12    (j) The Illinois Community College Board shall report 13annually to the Department on the race, ethnicity, and gender 14of all students participating in the cannabis curriculum 15necessary to obtain a Certificate, and of those students who 16obtain a Certificate.17(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19.) 18    (410 ILCS 705/25-35)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2026)20    Sec. 25-35. Community College Cannabis Vocational Training 21Pilot Program faculty participant agent identification card. 22    (a) The Department shall:23        (1) establish by rule the information required in an 24    initial application or renewal application for an agent 25    identification card submitted under this Article and the   HB4515- 33 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    nonrefundable fee to accompany the initial application or 2    renewal application;3        (2) verify the information contained in an initial 4    application or renewal application for an agent 5    identification card submitted under this Article, and 6    approve or deny an application within 30 days of receiving 7    a completed initial application or renewal application and 8    all supporting documentation required by rule;9        (3) issue an agent identification card to a qualifying 10    agent within 15 business days of approving the initial 11    application or renewal application;12        (4) enter the license number of the community college 13    where the agent works; and14        (5) allow for an electronic initial application and 15    renewal application process, and provide a confirmation by 16    electronic or other methods that an application has been 17    submitted. Each Department may by rule require prospective 18    agents to file their applications by electronic means and 19    to provide notices to the agents by electronic means.20    (b) An agent must keep his or her identification card 21visible at all times when in the enclosed, locked facility, or 22facilities for which he or she is an agent.23    (c) The agent identification cards shall contain the 24following:25        (1) the name of the cardholder;26        (2) the date of issuance and expiration date of the   HB4515- 34 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    identification card;2        (3) a random 10-digit alphanumeric identification 3    number containing at least 4 numbers and at least 4 4    letters that is unique to the holder;5        (4) a photograph of the cardholder; and6        (5) the legal name of the community college employing 7    the agent.8    (d) An agent identification card shall be immediately 9returned to the community college of the agent upon 10termination of his or her employment.11    (e) Any agent identification card lost shall be reported 12to the Illinois State Police and the Department of Agriculture 13immediately upon discovery of the loss.14    (f) An agent applicant may begin employment at a Community 15College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot Program while the 16agent applicant's identification card application is pending. 17Upon approval, the Department shall issue the agent's 18identification card to the agent. If denied, the Community 19College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot Program and the 20agent applicant shall be notified and the agent applicant must 21cease all activity at the Community College Cannabis 22Vocational Training Pilot Program immediately. 23(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 24102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 25    (410 ILCS 705/50-5)  HB4515- 35 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    Sec. 50-5. Laboratory testing. 2    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 3following acts, when performed by a cannabis testing facility 4with a current, valid registration, or a person 21 years of age 5or older who is acting in his or her capacity as an owner, 6employee, or agent of a cannabis testing facility, are not 7unlawful and shall not be an offense under Illinois law or be a 8basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under Illinois law:9        (1) possessing, repackaging, transporting, storing, or 10    displaying cannabis or cannabis-infused products;11        (2) receiving or transporting cannabis or 12    cannabis-infused products from a cannabis business 13    establishment, a community college licensed under the 14    Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 15    Program, or a person 21 years of age or older; and16        (3) returning or transporting cannabis or 17    cannabis-infused products to a cannabis business 18    establishment, a community college licensed under the 19    Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 20    Program, or a person 21 years of age or older.21    (b)(1) No laboratory shall handle, test, or analyze 22cannabis unless approved by the Department of Agriculture in 23accordance with this Section.24    (2) No laboratory shall be approved to handle, test, or 25analyze cannabis unless the laboratory:26        (A) is accredited by a private laboratory accrediting   HB4515- 36 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    organization;2        (B) is independent from all other persons involved in 3    the cannabis industry in Illinois and no person with a 4    direct or indirect interest in the laboratory has a direct 5    or indirect financial, management, or other interest in an 6    Illinois cultivation center, craft grower, dispensary, 7    infuser, transporter, certifying physician, or any other 8    entity in the State that may benefit from the production, 9    manufacture, dispensing, sale, purchase, or use of 10    cannabis; and 11        (C) has employed at least one person to oversee and be 12    responsible for the laboratory testing who has earned, 13    from a college or university accredited by a national or 14    regional certifying authority, at least:15            (i) a master's level degree in chemical or 16        biological sciences and a minimum of 2 years' 17        post-degree laboratory experience; or18            (ii) a bachelor's degree in chemical or biological 19        sciences and a minimum of 4 years' post-degree 20        laboratory experience.21    (3) Each independent testing laboratory that claims to be 22accredited must provide the Department of Agriculture with a 23copy of the most recent annual inspection report granting 24accreditation and every annual report thereafter.25    (c) Immediately before manufacturing or natural processing 26of any cannabis or cannabis-infused product or packaging   HB4515- 37 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1cannabis for sale to a dispensary, each batch shall be made 2available by the cultivation center, craft grower, or infuser 3for an employee of an approved laboratory to select a random 4sample, which shall be tested by the approved laboratory for:5        (1) microbiological contaminants;6        (2) mycotoxins;7        (3) pesticide active ingredients;8        (4) residual solvent; and9        (5) an active ingredient analysis.10    (d) The Department of Agriculture may select a random 11sample that shall, for the purposes of conducting an active 12ingredient analysis, be tested by the Department of 13Agriculture for verification of label information.14    (e) A laboratory shall immediately return or dispose of 15any cannabis upon the completion of any testing, use, or 16research. If cannabis is disposed of, it shall be done in 17compliance with Department of Agriculture rule.18    (f) If a sample of cannabis does not pass the 19microbiological, mycotoxin, pesticide chemical residue, or 20solvent residue test, based on the standards established by 21the Department of Agriculture, the following shall apply: 22        (1) If the sample failed the pesticide chemical 23    residue test, the entire batch from which the sample was 24    taken shall, if applicable, be recalled as provided by 25    rule.26        (2) If the sample failed any other test, the batch may   HB4515- 38 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    be used to make a CO2-based or solvent based extract. After 2    processing, the CO2-based or solvent based extract must 3    still pass all required tests. 4    (g) The Department of Agriculture shall establish 5standards for microbial, mycotoxin, pesticide residue, solvent 6residue, or other standards for the presence of possible 7contaminants, in addition to labeling requirements for 8contents and potency.9    (h) The laboratory shall file with the Department of 10Agriculture an electronic copy of each laboratory test result 11for any batch that does not pass the microbiological, 12mycotoxin, or pesticide chemical residue test, at the same 13time that it transmits those results to the cultivation 14center. In addition, the laboratory shall maintain the 15laboratory test results for at least 5 years and make them 16available at the Department of Agriculture's request.17    (i) A cultivation center, craft grower, and infuser shall 18provide to a dispensing organization the laboratory test 19results for each batch of cannabis product purchased by the 20dispensing organization, if sampled. Each dispensing 21organization must have those laboratory results available upon 22request to purchasers.23    (j) The Department of Agriculture may adopt rules related 24to testing in furtherance of this Act.25(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.)   HB4515- 39 -LRB104 16431 BDA 29822 b1    (410 ILCS 705/25-45 rep.)2    Section 10. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 3by repealing Section 25-45. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.